District of Columbia statutes.
32-1009

Posting of act and regulations on premises; distribution of copies to employers.

(a)

Every employer who is subject to any provision of this subchapter or any regulation issued under this subchapter shall keep a copy or summary of this subchapter and any applicable regulation issued under this subchapter, in a form prescribed or approved by the Mayor, posted in a conspicuous and accessible place in or about the premises at which any employee covered by the regulation is employed. If an employer fails to comply with this requirement, the period prescribed in § 32-1308(c) shall not begin until the employer posts or provides the required notice.

(b)

Employers shall be furnished copies or summaries of this subchapter by the Mayor without charge, in accordance with subchapter II of Chapter 19 of Title 2 [§ 2-1931 et seq.].

(c)

Employers shall be furnished with copies or summaries of this subchapter within 60 days of February 26, 2015. An employer shall not be liable for failure to post notice if the Mayor has failed to provide to the employer the notice required by this section.

History

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 10, 40 DCR 761
Mar. 11, 2014, D.C. Law 20-91, § 2(b), 61 DCR 778
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 3(e), 61 DCR 10157

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1010.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-220.8.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-91 deleted “on request” preceding “without charge” in (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-157 added the last sentence in (a); added “in accordance with subchapter II of Chapter 19 of Title 2” in (b); and added (c).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(b) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91 § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91, § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b)(2) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 2(c) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91, § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-91: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-91 provided that sections 2(b)-(d) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-91 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7004.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.